Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-369
Tax Commissioner; rules and regulations; adopt; publish.

The Tax Commissioner shall make, adopt, and publish such rules and regulations as he or she may deem necessary and desirable to carry out the powers and duties imposed upon him or her and the Department of Revenue.

Laws 1969, c. 630, § 3, p. 2532;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-342;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 40;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 7.